DI-248

DIAGNOSTICS

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

DIARJ-01

DTC

C1241 /41

IG Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1241/ 41

Detection of any of conditions 1. through 4.:

1. Vehicle speed is 3 km/h (1.9 mph) or more and voltage
of ECU terminal IG remains at below 9.5 V for more than
10 sec.

. While the condition that the solenoid relay is ON contin-
ues, ECU terminal IG1 voltage becomes 9.5 V or less,
and the condition that the contact point of the solenoid
relay is OFF continues for 0.2 sec. or more.

. The condition that ECU terminal IG1 voltage is more
than 17.0 V continues for 1.2 sec. or more.

. While the solenoid relay outputs ON signal, ECU termi-
nal IG1 voltage becomes more than 17.0 V, and the
condition that the contact point of the solenoid relay is
OFF continues for 0.2 sec. or more.

* Battery

«ICregulator
e Power source circuit
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-249
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester:

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:
”Normal” is displayed.
Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:
ON PREPARATION:
GND2 Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
GND1 ([ 1G1GND3 A CHECK:
' § £ —_5 gr—in) (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.
G (b) Measure voltage between terminals IG1 and GND of skid
\M/V control ECU connector.
GND4 OK:
) @ ®__J Voltage: 10 - 14 V

F09165
OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
skid control ECU.
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3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of skid control ECU connector and body

ground.
CHECK:
G;.ND1 GND2 G‘}\'DS GND4 Measure resistance between terminal GND of skid control ECU
/ -~ ,_;_. connector and body ground.
onooon g_oooni
AR )EobH00 o) 5oAos oo OK:

T \W/V Resistance: 1 Q or less
: o\
O}

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

4 Check ECU-IG fuse.

Cowl Side J/B LH: PREPARATION:
Remove ECU-IG fuse from cowl side J/B LH.
CHECK:
Check continuity of ECU-IG fuse.
e OKi i
1, Continuity
[onoongon

ECU-IG

F04448

components connected to ECU-IG fuse (See at-
tached wiring diagram).

NG> Check for short circuit in all the harness and

@

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between skid control ECU and battery (See page
IN-38).
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